Missouri, session 2026, SB1336.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 99, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 99.720, to read as
follows:
99.720. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Authority", a public body corporate and politic
created under section 99.330 or any other public body
exercising the powers, rights, and duties of such an
authority;
(2) "First-time home buyer", an individual with no
present ownership interest in a principal residence during
the three-year period ending on the date of the purchase of
the principal residence in which the individual is seeking a
tax credit under this section;
(3) "Purchase", any acquisition of property except for
acquisitions from a person related to the person acquiring
the property or related to the spouse of the person
acquiring the property. Persons shall be considered related
only if they are within the first or second degree of
consanguinity or if the relationship between such persons

SB 1336 2
would result in the disallowance of losses under 26 U.S.C.
Section 267.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, any person meeting the requirements of subsection 3 of
this section and purchasing property meeting the
requirements of subsection 4 of this section shall be
eligible for a credit against the tax imposed under chapter
143, excluding withholding tax imposed under sections
143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to five thousand
dollars. The tax credit shall not be claimed more than
once, or by more than one person, for a particular property.
3. To be eligible for the tax credit provided under
this section, an applicant shall:
(1) Be a first-time home buyer;
(2) Enter into an agreement with the authority that
requires the applicant and any subsequent owner, except any
lender with a security interest, to use the purchased
property as a single-family, principal residence of the
owner for a period of at least two years following
rehabilitation of the property, unless the authority finds
such requirement to be a hardship for the owner-occupant;
(3) Purchase the property within one year prior to the
application date or produce a contract for the purchase of
the property requiring acquisition no later than six months
after the application date; and
(4) Have an income at the time of acquisition at or
below the income levels described under subdivision (2) of
section 32.105.
4. To be eligible for the tax credit authorized under
this section, a property shall:

SB 1336 3
(1) Be eligible for a tax abatement certificate under
section 99.700 and have had an application for the same
submitted to the authority;
(2) Be vacant for at least six months prior to the
purchase by the applicant;
(3) Be blighted in part because the governing body, or
its subordinate department, of the municipality in which the
property is located has:
(a) Determined that, because of its deteriorated
physical condition, the property is a dangerous building and
thereby uninhabitable; or
(b) Issued property maintenance code violations, and
the property is still in violation; and
(4) Be likely to meet the definition of an affordable
housing unit as defined under section 32.105 for the two-
year period described under subdivision (2) of subsection 3
of this section.
5. The authority and the department of revenue may
prescribe rules to implement the provisions of this
section. The authority may require applicants to provide
evidence, in a form acceptable to the authority, that the
requirements of this section are satisfied. The authority,
upon finding that a taxpayer and the property are eligible
for the tax credit authorized under this section, shall
issue a certificate to the taxpayer evidencing the issuance
of the credit. If the authority finds the agreement
described under subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this
section has been breached by the taxpayer, the authority
shall notify the department of revenue, which may, in its
discretion, seek recapture from the taxpayer of all or a
portion of the tax credit within four years of the issuance
of the certificate by the authority. Any rule or portion of

SB 1336 4
a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. The tax credit authorized under this section shall
not be refundable. Any amount of credit that exceeds the
tax due for a taxpayer's tax year may be carried forward to
any of the taxpayer's five subsequent tax years. The tax
credit shall not be assignable. The taxpayer shall submit,
at the time of filing the taxpayer's return, the certificate
issued by the authority. In the case of failure to attach
the certificate, no credit under this section shall be
allowed for that year until the certificate is provided to
100 the department of revenue.
101 7. The tax credit authorized pursuant to this section
102 shall be considered a domestic and social tax credit for the
103 purposes of sections 135.800 to 135.830.
104 8. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
105 act:
106 (1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
107 shall automatically sunset six years after the effective
108 date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
109 general assembly;
110 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of
111 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in

SB 1336 5
112 which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
113 sunset; and
114 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
115 construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
116 obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
117 redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
118 prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
119 section is sunset.
✓